Utah statutes.
7-8-19.   Meetings of the board of directors.

(1)  A quorum of the board of directors of each industrial bank shall meet at least once each quarter.

(2)  Minutes of each meeting of the board of directors shall be:

(a)  kept by the secretary of the industrial bank; and

(b)  maintained at the head office of the industrial bank.

